phon-insertboundary.xfst
!
! Insert root/morpheme/IG boundaries.
!
define pSym @"pos-symbols.a";
define aSym @"analysis-symbols.a";

regex  [..] -> ⟪IGB⟫  || pSym ?* _ aSym pSym
    ,, [..] -> ⟪MB⟫   || aSym  _ [aSym \pSym|\pSym \pSym|pSym \pSym|\pSym .#.|pSym .#.|.#.]
    ,, [..] -> ⟪RB⟫   || .#. [\pSym]+ _ pSym 
    ,, pSym -> 0
;
